Florida, session 2026, SB642.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 624.4094, Florida Statutes, is amended 15 to read: 16 624.4094âBail bond premiums.â 17 (1)âThe Legislature finds that a significant portion of 18 bail bond premiums is retained by the licensed bail bond agents 19 or appointed managing general agents. For purposes of reporting 20 in financial statements required to be filed with the office 21 pursuant to s. 624.424, direct written premiums for bail bonds 22 by a domestic, foreign, or alien insurer doing business in this 23 state must shall be reported net of any amounts retained by 24 licensed bail bond agents or appointed managing general agents. 25 However, in no case may shall the direct written premiums for 26 bail bonds be less than 6.5 percent of the total consideration 27 received by the agent for all bail bonds written by the agent. 28 This subsection also applies to any determination of compliance 29 with s. 624.4095. 30 (2)âPremiums assumed by a domestic, foreign, or alien 31 insurer must shall be reported consistent with subsections (1) 32 and (4) for purposes of filing financial statements with the 33 office. 34 (3)âEach domestic, foreign, or alien bail bond insurer 35 shall keep complete and accurate records of the total 36 consideration paid for all bail bonds written by such insurer. 37 (4)âEach domestic, foreign, or alien bail bond insurer 38 shall disclose the following information in the notes to the 39 financial statement in the insurerâs annual statement filed with 40 the office. 41 (a)âThe gross bail bond premiums written in each state by 42 agents for the company. 43 (b)âThe amount of premium taxes incurred by the company in 44 each state. 45 (c)âTotal consideration withheld by agents and not reported 46 as an expense by the insurer in financial statements filed with 47 the office. 48 (d)âThe amount of bail bond premium included on the surety 49 line of the annual statement filed with the office. 50 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.